Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB96.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.092 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Category I and Category II square feet" means square footage that falls under space categories as
defined by the Postsecondary Education Facilities Inventory and Classification Manual published by the
United States Department of Education;
(b) "Comprehensive university" has the same meaning as in KRS 164.001;
(c) "Council" means the Council on Postsecondary Education;
(d) "Equilibrium" means a condition in which every institution has an appropriately proportionate level of
resources as determined by the performance funding model established in this section given each
institution's level of productivity in achieving student success outcomes, course completion outcomes,
and other components included in the model;
(e) "Formula base amount" means an institution's enacted general fund appropriation amount minus debt
service on bonds and appropriations for mandated programs;
(f) "Hold-harmless provision" means a provision included in the funding formulas as described in
subsection (9) of this section that prevents a reduction of a designated portion of funding for an
institution through operation of the funding formula;
(g) "Institution" means a college in the Kentucky Community and Technical College System or a public
university;
(h) "KCTCS" means the Kentucky Community and Technical College System;
(i) "KCTCS institution allocable resources" means the formula base amount net of any equity adjustment
as described in subsection (7)(b) of this section, any amount protected by a hold-harmless provision,
and any applicable increase or decrease in general fund appropriations;
(j) "Mandated program" means a research or public service activity that is not integral to the instructional
mission of the institution and is identified by the General Assembly in the biennial budget;
(k) "Nontraditional age students" means students between the ages of twenty-five (25) and sixty-four (64);
(l) "Performance fund" means the postsecondary education performance fund established in subsection
(13) of this section;
(m) "Research universities" means the University of Kentucky and the University of Louisville;
(n) "Stop-loss provision" means a provision included in the funding formulas as described in subsection (9)
of this section to limit reduction of an institution's funding amount to a predetermined percentage,
notwithstanding the amounts calculated by operation of the formula; and
(o) "University allocable resources" means the formula base amount net of any small school adjustment as
described in subsection (5)(c) of this section, any amount protected by a hold-harmless provision, and
any applicable increase or decrease in general fund appropriations.
(2) The General Assembly hereby finds that improving opportunity for the Commonwealth's citizens and building
a stronger economy can be achieved by its public college and university system focusing its efforts and
resources on the goals of:
(a) Increasing the retention and progression of students toward timely credential or degree completion;
(b) Increasing the number and types of credentials and degrees earned by all types of students;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) Increasing the number of credentials and degrees that garner higher salaries upon graduation, such as
science, technology, engineering, math, and health, and in areas of industry demand;
(d) Closing achievement gaps by increasing the number of credentials and degrees earned by low-income
students, underprepared students, underrepresented students, and nontraditional age students; and
(e) Facilitating credit hour accumulation and transfer of students from KCTCS to four (4) year
postsecondary institutions.
(3) (a) The General Assembly hereby declares these goals can best be accomplished by implementing a
comprehensive funding model for the allocation of state general fund appropriations for postsecondary
institution operations that aligns the Commonwealth's investments in postsecondary education with the
Commonwealth's postsecondary education policy goals and objectives.
(b) The General Assembly further recognizes that priority for state general fund appropriations for
postsecondary institutions should be given to each institution's funding floor over appropriations to the
performance fund. For purposes of this section, "funding floor" means an institution's fiscal year 2020-
2021 general fund appropriation included in 2020 Ky. Acts ch. 92, plus any fiscal year 2020-2021
distribution from the performance fund, and minus fiscal year 2020-2021 debt service on bonds and
appropriations for mandated programs.
(4) This section establishes a comprehensive funding model for the public postsecondary education system to be
implemented by the Council on Postsecondary Education. The funding model shall include a public university
sector formula and a KCTCS sector formula, and shall not include any race-based metrics or targets in the
formulas.
(5) The funding formula for the public university sector shall:
(a) Recognize differences in missions and cost structures between research universities and comprehensive
universities to ensure that neither are advantaged or disadvantaged during the first full year of
implementation;
(b) Distribute one hundred percent (100%) of the university allocable resources for all universities in the
sector, based on rational criteria, including student success, course completion, and operational support
components, regardless of whether state funding for postsecondary institution operations increases,
decreases, or remains stable;
(c) Include an adjustment to minimize impact on smaller campuses as determined by the council; and
(d) Be constructed to achieve equilibrium, at which point the funding formula rewards rates of
improvement above the sector average rate.
(6) Funding for the public university sector shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Forty percent (40%) of total university allocable resources shall be distributed based on each
university's share of total student success outcomes produced, including but not limited to:
1. Bachelor's degree production;
2. Numbers of students progressing beyond thirty (30), sixty (60), and ninety (90) credit hour
thresholds;
3. Science, technology, engineering, math, and health bachelor's degree production; and
4. Bachelor's degrees earned by low-income students and underrepresented students;
(b) Thirty percent (30%) of total university allocable resources shall be distributed based on each
university's share of sector total student credit hours earned, excluding dual credit enrollment, weighted
to account for cost differences by academic discipline and course level, such as lower and upper
division baccalaureate, master's, doctoral research, doctoral professional, and nontraditional age
students; and
(c) Thirty percent (30%) of total university allocable resources shall be distributed in support of vital
campus operations as follows:
1. Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed based on each university's share of Category I and
Category II square feet, net of research, nonclass laboratory, and open laboratory space, to
support maintenance and operation of campus facilities and may include a space utilization factor

CHAPTER 176 3
as determined by the council in collaboration with the working group established in subsection
(11) of this section;
2. Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed based on each university's share of total instruction and
student services spending, net of maintenance and operation, to support campus administrative
functions; and
3. Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed based on each university's share of total full-time
equivalent student enrollment to support academic support services such as libraries and
academic computing.
(7) The funding formula for the KCTCS sector:
(a) Shall distribute one hundred percent (100%) of KCTCS institution allocable resources for all KCTCS
colleges based on rational criteria, including student success, course completion, and operational
support components, regardless of whether state funding for postsecondary institution operations
increases, decreases, or remains stable;
(b) May include an adjustment to account for community economic disadvantage in some regions of the
Commonwealth as determined by the council; and
(c) Shall be constructed to achieve equilibrium, at which point the funding formula rewards rates of
improvement above the sector average rate.
(8) Funding for the KCTCS sector shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Thirty-five percent (35%) of total KCTCS institution allocable resources shall be distributed based on
each college's share of total student success outcomes produced, including but not limited to:
1. Certificate, diploma, and associate degree production, weighted to provide a premium for
credentials that are aligned with the economic needs of the state;
2. Numbers of students progressing beyond fifteen (15), thirty (30), and forty-five (45) credit hour
thresholds;
3. Credentials earned by low-income students, underprepared students, underrepresented students,
and nontraditional age students; and
4. Transfers to four (4) year institutions;
(b) Thirty-five percent (35%) of total KCTCS institution allocable resources shall be distributed based on
each college's share of total student credit hours earned, weighted to account for cost differences by
academic discipline; and
(c) Thirty percent (30%) of total KCTCS institution allocable resources shall be distributed in support of
vital campus operations as follows:
1. Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed based on each college's share of Category I and Category
II square feet, net of research, nonclass laboratory, and open laboratory space, to support
maintenance and operation of campus facilities and may include a space utilization factor as
determined by the council in collaboration with the postsecondary education working group
established in subsection (11) of this section;
2. Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed based on each college's share of total instruction and
student services spending, net of maintenance and operation, to support campus administrative
functions; and
3. Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed based on each college's share of total full-time equivalent
student enrollment to support academic support services such as libraries and academic
computing.
(9) (a) The funding formula for both sectors shall include:
1. A hold-harmless provision for fiscal year 2018-2019 preventing a reduction in an institution's
funding amount based solely on the formula calculation, and allowing a hold-harmless amount
determined by the formula in fiscal year 2018-2019 to be deducted from an institution's formula
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
base amount in whole or in part in fiscal years 2019-2020 and 2020-2021, as determined by the
council;
2. A hold-harmless provision for fiscal year 2021-2022, and every fiscal year thereafter, preventing
a reduction in an institution's funding amount based solely on the formula calculation;
3. A stop-loss provision for fiscal year 2019-2020 limiting the reduction in funding to any
institution to one percent (1%) of that institution's formula base amount;
4. A stop-loss provision for fiscal year 2020-2021 limiting the reduction in funding to any
institution to two percent (2%) of that institution's formula base amount; and
5. A stop-loss provision for fiscal year 2021-2022, and every fiscal year thereafter, limiting the
reduction in funding to any institution to zero percent (0%) of that institution's formula base
amount.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be construed to limit the level of a budget reduction that may
be enacted by the General Assembly or implemented by the Governor.
(10) (a) By May 1 each year, the council shall certify to the Office of the State Budget Director the amount to be
distributed to each of the public universities and KCTCS as determined by the comprehensive funding
model created in this section, not to exceed the available balance in the performance fund.
(b) The Office of the State Budget Director shall distribute the appropriations in the performance fund for
that fiscal year to the institutions in the amounts the council has certified. The adjusted appropriations to
each institution shall be allotted as provided in KRS 48.600, 48.605, 48.610, 48.620, and 48.630.
(c) 1. The certified amounts distributed from the performance fund to the institutions are nonrecurring
funds that shall not be included in the institutions' base budget amounts submitted in their
biennial budget requests.
2. The certified amounts distributed from the performance fund in the previous fiscal year shall be
included in the performance fund's base budget amount submitted by the council in the biennial
budget request.
(d) For fiscal year 2017-2018, the Office of the State Budget Director shall distribute to the public
postsecondary education institutions, except for Kentucky State University, those funds appropriated to
the performance fund by the General Assembly in 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 149, Part I, K., 12., in accordance
with the comprehensive funding model created in this section.
(11) (a) The Council on Postsecondary Education is hereby directed to establish a postsecondary education
working group composed of the following:
1. The president of the council, who shall serve as chairperson of the working group and a
nonvoting member;
2. The president or designee of each public postsecondary institution, including the president of
KCTCS;
3. The Governor or designee;
4. Five (5) members of the House of Representatives appointed based on proportional political
affiliation in the House, with members of the majority appointed by the Speaker of the House
and members of the minority appointed by the Minority Floor Leader of the House[ or
designee]; and
5. Five (5) members of the Senate appointed based on proportional political affiliation in the
Senate, with members of the majority appointed by the President of the Senate and members of
the minority appointed by the Minority Floor Leader of the Senate[ or designee].
(b) Beginning in calendar[fiscal] year 2026[2020-2021] and every four (4) calendar[three (3) fiscal] years
thereafter, the postsecondary education working group shall convene to determine if the comprehensive
funding model is functioning as expected, identify any unintended consequences of the model, and
recommend any adjustments to the model. The council may call the working group to convene prior to
the start of the required calendar[fiscal] year to allow sufficient time for the group to complete its work.

CHAPTER 176 5
(c) The results of the review and recommendations of the working group shall be reported by the council to
the Governor, the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue, and the Interim Joint
Committee on Education by December 1 of each[ fiscal] year the working group convenes.
(12) The council shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to implement the provisions
of this section.
(13) (a) The postsecondary education performance fund is hereby established as an appropriation unit to support
improvement in the operations of the public postsecondary institutions and achievement of the
Commonwealth's education policy goals and workforce development priorities. General fund moneys
may be appropriated by the General Assembly to this fund for distribution to the public postsecondary
institutions in amounts determined through the comprehensive funding model created in this section.
(b) Any balance in the performance fund at the close of any fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried
forward to the next fiscal year and be continuously appropriated for the purposes specified in this
section. A general statement that all continuing appropriations are repealed, discontinued, or suspended
shall not operate to repeal, discontinue, or suspend this fund or to repeal this action.
Section 2. Whereas the work of the postsecondary education working group is necessary for the funding of
public postsecondary education institutions, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its
passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Veto Overridden April 14, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version